Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7102
Purpose and intent.

The purpose and intent of the Managed Care Plan Network Adequacy Act are to establish standards for the creation and maintenance of networks by health carriers and to assure the adequacy, accessibility, and quality of health care services offered under a managed care plan by establishing requirements for written agreements between health carriers offering managed care plans and participating providers regarding the standards, terms, and provisions under which the participating provider will provide services to covered persons.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 40.